Massachusetts, session 194th, H1173.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10N, the following section:-
Section 10R. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings:
“Community health worker” means a frontline health worker who Serves as a liaison
between patients, health-care providers, social service providers and community members to
facilitate access to health-related services in the community the health worker serves, including
access to physical, behavioral, and preventive health services or access to services to address
social determinants of health.
of 3

“Patient navigation services” means the following services furnished by a community
health worker to patients in their communities:
1. Services to prevent or screen for chronic diseases (such as cancer) and services
designed to slow the progression of chronic diseases.
2. Screenings for nonclinical and social needs and referrals to appropriate services and
agencies to meet those needs.
3. Group and individual education to prevent illness or disease, including the promotion
of healthy behaviors to increase awareness and prevent the development of illness or disease.
4. Health coaching, health navigation, health advocacy, and individual supports,
including transitions of care supports.
5. Overcoming cultural factors, such as language, socioeconomic status, or health
literacy, to properly understand treatment options or treatment plans.
6. Diagnosis-related patient education with respect to treatment and self-management of a
health condition or illness, including helping patients learn to effectively comply with medical
care instructions.
7. Any other service approved by the division.
(b) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide coverage
for patient navigation service as defined in this section to improve access to care for individuals
who are eligible for screening, follow-up or treatment services.
of 3

(c) Reimbursement shall be provided to individuals who are trained and have completed a
national patient navigation certification or credentialing program, or other certification or
training program approved by the Executive Office of Health and Human Services.
(d) The executive office of health and human services shall obtain any federal
authorization necessary to implement this section and maximize federal financial participation
for the coverage and benefits provided under this section.
(e) The office of Medicaid shall promulgate regulations or other guidance necessary to
effectuate this section.
(f) This act shall apply to all contracts entered into, renewed or amended on or after
January 1, 2026.
of 3